Illinois, session 104th, HB1756.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-172 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-172)7    Sec. 15-172. Low-Income Senior Citizens Assessment Freeze 8Homestead Exemption. 9    (a) This Section may be cited as the Low-Income Senior 10Citizens Assessment Freeze Homestead Exemption.11    (b) As used in this Section:12    "Applicant" means an individual who has filed an 13application under this Section.14    "Base amount" means the base year equalized assessed value 15of the residence plus the first year's equalized assessed 16value of any added improvements which increased the assessed 17value of the residence after the base year.18    "Base year" means the taxable year prior to the taxable 19year for which the applicant first qualifies and applies for 20the exemption provided that in the prior taxable year the 21property was improved with a permanent structure that was 22occupied as a residence by the applicant who was liable for 23paying real property taxes on the property and who was either   HB1756- 2 -LRB104 05744 HLH 15774 b1(i) an owner of record of the property or had legal or 2equitable interest in the property as evidenced by a written 3instrument or (ii) had a legal or equitable interest as a 4lessee in the parcel of property that was single family 5residence. If in any subsequent taxable year for which the 6applicant applies and qualifies for the exemption the 7equalized assessed value of the residence is less than the 8equalized assessed value in the existing base year (provided 9that such equalized assessed value is not based on an assessed 10value that results from a temporary irregularity in the 11property that reduces the assessed value for one or more 12taxable years), then that subsequent taxable year shall become 13the base year until a new base year is established under the 14terms of this paragraph. For taxable year 1999 only, the Chief 15County Assessment Officer shall review (i) all taxable years 16for which the applicant applied and qualified for the 17exemption and (ii) the existing base year. The assessment 18officer shall select as the new base year the year with the 19lowest equalized assessed value. An equalized assessed value 20that is based on an assessed value that results from a 21temporary irregularity in the property that reduces the 22assessed value for one or more taxable years shall not be 23considered the lowest equalized assessed value. The selected 24year shall be the base year for taxable year 1999 and 25thereafter until a new base year is established under the 26terms of this paragraph.  HB1756- 3 -LRB104 05744 HLH 15774 b1    "Chief County Assessment Officer" means the County 2Assessor or Supervisor of Assessments of the county in which 3the property is located.4    "Equalized assessed value" means the assessed value as 5equalized by the Illinois Department of Revenue.6    "Household" means the applicant, the spouse of the 7applicant, and all persons using the residence of the 8applicant as their principal place of residence.9    "Household income" means the combined income of the 10members of a household for the calendar year preceding the 11taxable year.12    "Income" has the same meaning as provided in Section 3.07 13of the Senior Citizens and Persons with Disabilities Property 14Tax Relief Act, except that, beginning in assessment year 152001, "income" does not include veteran's benefits.16    "Internal Revenue Code of 1986" means the United States 17Internal Revenue Code of 1986 or any successor law or laws 18relating to federal income taxes in effect for the year 19preceding the taxable year.20    "Life care facility that qualifies as a cooperative" means 21a facility as defined in Section 2 of the Life Care Facilities 22Act.23    "Maximum income limitation" means:24        (1) $35,000 prior to taxable year 1999;25        (2) $40,000 in taxable years 1999 through 2003;26        (3) $45,000 in taxable years 2004 through 2005;  HB1756- 4 -LRB104 05744 HLH 15774 b1        (4) $50,000 in taxable years 2006 and 2007;2        (5) $55,000 in taxable years 2008 through 2016; 3        (6) for taxable year 2017, (i) $65,000 for qualified 4    property located in a county with 3,000,000 or more 5    inhabitants and (ii) $55,000 for qualified property 6    located in a county with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants; 7    and 8        (7) for taxable years 2018 through 2025 and 9    thereafter, $65,000 for all qualified property; and . 10        (8) for taxable years 2026 and thereafter, $75,000 for 11    all qualified property. 12    As an alternative income valuation, a homeowner who is 13enrolled in any of the following programs may be presumed to 14have household income that does not exceed the maximum income 15limitation for that tax year as required by this Section: Aid 16to the Aged, Blind or Disabled (AABD) Program or the 17Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), both of 18which are administered by the Department of Human Services; 19the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP), which 20is administered by the Department of Commerce and Economic 21Opportunity; The Benefit Access program, which is administered 22by the Department on Aging; and the Senior Citizens Real 23Estate Tax Deferral Program. 24    A chief county assessment officer may indicate that he or 25she has verified an applicant's income eligibility for this 26exemption but may not report which program or programs, if   HB1756- 5 -LRB104 05744 HLH 15774 b1any, enroll the applicant. Release of personal information 2submitted pursuant to this Section shall be deemed an 3unwarranted invasion of personal privacy under the Freedom of 4Information Act. 5    "Residence" means the principal dwelling place and 6appurtenant structures used for residential purposes in this 7State occupied on January 1 of the taxable year by a household 8and so much of the surrounding land, constituting the parcel 9upon which the dwelling place is situated, as is used for 10residential purposes. If the Chief County Assessment Officer 11has established a specific legal description for a portion of 12property constituting the residence, then that portion of 13property shall be deemed the residence for the purposes of 14this Section.15    "Taxable year" means the calendar year during which ad 16valorem property taxes payable in the next succeeding year are 17levied.18    (c) Beginning in taxable year 1994, a low-income senior 19citizens assessment freeze homestead exemption is granted for 20real property that is improved with a permanent structure that 21is occupied as a residence by an applicant who (i) is 65 years 22of age or older during the taxable year, (ii) has a household 23income that does not exceed the maximum income limitation, 24(iii) is liable for paying real property taxes on the 25property, and (iv) is an owner of record of the property or has 26a legal or equitable interest in the property as evidenced by a   HB1756- 6 -LRB104 05744 HLH 15774 b1written instrument. This homestead exemption shall also apply 2to a leasehold interest in a parcel of property improved with a 3permanent structure that is a single family residence that is 4occupied as a residence by a person who (i) is 65 years of age 5or older during the taxable year, (ii) has a household income 6that does not exceed the maximum income limitation, (iii) has 7a legal or equitable ownership interest in the property as 8lessee, and (iv) is liable for the payment of real property 9taxes on that property. 10    In counties of 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the amount 11of the exemption for all taxable years is the equalized 12assessed value of the residence in the taxable year for which 13application is made minus the base amount. In all other 14counties, the amount of the exemption is as follows: (i) 15through taxable year 2005 and for taxable year 2007 and 16thereafter, the amount of this exemption shall be the 17equalized assessed value of the residence in the taxable year 18for which application is made minus the base amount; and (ii) 19for taxable year 2006, the amount of the exemption is as 20follows:21        (1) For an applicant who has a household income of 22    $45,000 or less, the amount of the exemption is the 23    equalized assessed value of the residence in the taxable 24    year for which application is made minus the base amount.25        (2) For an applicant who has a household income 26    exceeding $45,000 but not exceeding $46,250, the amount of   HB1756- 7 -LRB104 05744 HLH 15774 b1    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 2    residence in the taxable year for which application is 3    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.8.4        (3) For an applicant who has a household income 5    exceeding $46,250 but not exceeding $47,500, the amount of 6    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 7    residence in the taxable year for which application is 8    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.6.9        (4) For an applicant who has a household income 10    exceeding $47,500 but not exceeding $48,750, the amount of 11    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 12    residence in the taxable year for which application is 13    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.4.14        (5) For an applicant who has a household income 15    exceeding $48,750 but not exceeding $50,000, the amount of 16    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 17    residence in the taxable year for which application is 18    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.2. 19    When the applicant is a surviving spouse of an applicant 20for a prior year for the same residence for which an exemption 21under this Section has been granted, the base year and base 22amount for that residence are the same as for the applicant for 23the prior year.24    Each year at the time the assessment books are certified 25to the County Clerk, the Board of Review or Board of Appeals 26shall give to the County Clerk a list of the assessed values of   HB1756- 8 -LRB104 05744 HLH 15774 b1improvements on each parcel qualifying for this exemption that 2were added after the base year for this parcel and that 3increased the assessed value of the property.4    In the case of land improved with an apartment building 5owned and operated as a cooperative or a building that is a 6life care facility that qualifies as a cooperative, the 7maximum reduction from the equalized assessed value of the 8property is limited to the sum of the reductions calculated 9for each unit occupied as a residence by a person or persons 10(i) 65 years of age or older, (ii) with a household income that 11does not exceed the maximum income limitation, (iii) who is 12liable, by contract with the owner or owners of record, for 13paying real property taxes on the property, and (iv) who is an 14owner of record of a legal or equitable interest in the 15cooperative apartment building, other than a leasehold 16interest. In the instance of a cooperative where a homestead 17exemption has been granted under this Section, the cooperative 18association or its management firm shall credit the savings 19resulting from that exemption only to the apportioned tax 20liability of the owner who qualified for the exemption. Any 21person who willfully refuses to credit that savings to an 22owner who qualifies for the exemption is guilty of a Class B 23misdemeanor.24    When a homestead exemption has been granted under this 25Section and an applicant then becomes a resident of a facility 26licensed under the Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the   HB1756- 9 -LRB104 05744 HLH 15774 b1Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized Mental Health 2Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community Care Act, or 3the MC/DD Act, the exemption shall be granted in subsequent 4years so long as the residence (i) continues to be occupied by 5the qualified applicant's spouse or (ii) if remaining 6unoccupied, is still owned by the qualified applicant for the 7homestead exemption.8    Beginning January 1, 1997, when an individual dies who 9would have qualified for an exemption under this Section, and 10the surviving spouse does not independently qualify for this 11exemption because of age, the exemption under this Section 12shall be granted to the surviving spouse for the taxable year 13preceding and the taxable year of the death, provided that, 14except for age, the surviving spouse meets all other 15qualifications for the granting of this exemption for those 16years.17    When married persons maintain separate residences, the 18exemption provided for in this Section may be claimed by only 19one of such persons and for only one residence.20    For taxable year 1994 only, in counties having less than 213,000,000 inhabitants, to receive the exemption, a person 22shall submit an application by February 15, 1995 to the Chief 23County Assessment Officer of the county in which the property 24is located. In counties having 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, 25for taxable year 1994 and all subsequent taxable years, to 26receive the exemption, a person may submit an application to   HB1756- 10 -LRB104 05744 HLH 15774 b1the Chief County Assessment Officer of the county in which the 2property is located during such period as may be specified by 3the Chief County Assessment Officer. The Chief County 4Assessment Officer in counties of 3,000,000 or more 5inhabitants shall annually give notice of the application 6period by mail or by publication. In counties having less than 73,000,000 inhabitants, beginning with taxable year 1995 and 8thereafter, to receive the exemption, a person shall submit an 9application by July 1 of each taxable year to the Chief County 10Assessment Officer of the county in which the property is 11located. A county may, by ordinance, establish a date for 12submission of applications that is different than July 1. The 13applicant shall submit with the application an affidavit of 14the applicant's total household income, age, marital status 15(and if married the name and address of the applicant's 16spouse, if known), and principal dwelling place of members of 17the household on January 1 of the taxable year. The Department 18shall establish, by rule, a method for verifying the accuracy 19of affidavits filed by applicants under this Section, and the 20Chief County Assessment Officer may conduct audits of any 21taxpayer claiming an exemption under this Section to verify 22that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the exemption. Each 23application shall contain or be verified by a written 24declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury. A 25taxpayer's signing a fraudulent application under this Act is 26perjury, as defined in Section 32-2 of the Criminal Code of   HB1756- 11 -LRB104 05744 HLH 15774 b12012. The applications shall be clearly marked as applications 2for the Low-Income Senior Citizens Assessment Freeze Homestead 3Exemption and must contain a notice that any taxpayer who 4receives the exemption is subject to an audit by the Chief 5County Assessment Officer.6    Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, in 7counties having fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if an 8applicant fails to file the application required by this 9Section in a timely manner and this failure to file is due to a 10mental or physical condition sufficiently severe so as to 11render the applicant incapable of filing the application in a 12timely manner, the Chief County Assessment Officer may extend 13the filing deadline for a period of 30 days after the applicant 14regains the capability to file the application, but in no case 15may the filing deadline be extended beyond 3 months of the 16original filing deadline. In order to receive the extension 17provided in this paragraph, the applicant shall provide the 18Chief County Assessment Officer with a signed statement from 19the applicant's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, 20or physician assistant stating the nature and extent of the 21condition, that, in the physician's, advanced practice 22registered nurse's, or physician assistant's opinion, the 23condition was so severe that it rendered the applicant 24incapable of filing the application in a timely manner, and 25the date on which the applicant regained the capability to 26file the application.  HB1756- 12 -LRB104 05744 HLH 15774 b1    Beginning January 1, 1998, notwithstanding any other 2provision to the contrary, in counties having fewer than 33,000,000 inhabitants, if an applicant fails to file the 4application required by this Section in a timely manner and 5this failure to file is due to a mental or physical condition 6sufficiently severe so as to render the applicant incapable of 7filing the application in a timely manner, the Chief County 8Assessment Officer may extend the filing deadline for a period 9of 3 months. In order to receive the extension provided in this 10paragraph, the applicant shall provide the Chief County 11Assessment Officer with a signed statement from the 12applicant's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or 13physician assistant stating the nature and extent of the 14condition, and that, in the physician's, advanced practice 15registered nurse's, or physician assistant's opinion, the 16condition was so severe that it rendered the applicant 17incapable of filing the application in a timely manner.18    In counties having less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if an 19applicant was denied an exemption in taxable year 1994 and the 20denial occurred due to an error on the part of an assessment 21official, or his or her agent or employee, then beginning in 22taxable year 1997 the applicant's base year, for purposes of 23determining the amount of the exemption, shall be 1993 rather 24than 1994. In addition, in taxable year 1997, the applicant's 25exemption shall also include an amount equal to (i) the amount 26of any exemption denied to the applicant in taxable year 1995   HB1756- 13 -LRB104 05744 HLH 15774 b1as a result of using 1994, rather than 1993, as the base year, 2(ii) the amount of any exemption denied to the applicant in 3taxable year 1996 as a result of using 1994, rather than 1993, 4as the base year, and (iii) the amount of the exemption 5erroneously denied for taxable year 1994.6    For purposes of this Section, a person who will be 65 years 7of age during the current taxable year shall be eligible to 8apply for the homestead exemption during that taxable year. 9Application shall be made during the application period in 10effect for the county of his or her residence. 11    The Chief County Assessment Officer may determine the 12eligibility of a life care facility that qualifies as a 13cooperative to receive the benefits provided by this Section 14by use of an affidavit, application, visual inspection, 15questionnaire, or other reasonable method in order to insure 16that the tax savings resulting from the exemption are credited 17by the management firm to the apportioned tax liability of 18each qualifying resident. The Chief County Assessment Officer 19may request reasonable proof that the management firm has so 20credited that exemption.21    Except as provided in this Section, all information 22received by the chief county assessment officer or the 23Department from applications filed under this Section, or from 24any investigation conducted under the provisions of this 25Section, shall be confidential, except for official purposes 26or pursuant to official procedures for collection of any State   HB1756- 14 -LRB104 05744 HLH 15774 b1or local tax or enforcement of any civil or criminal penalty or 2sanction imposed by this Act or by any statute or ordinance 3imposing a State or local tax. Any person who divulges any such 4information in any manner, except in accordance with a proper 5judicial order, is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.6    Nothing contained in this Section shall prevent the 7Director or chief county assessment officer from publishing or 8making available reasonable statistics concerning the 9operation of the exemption contained in this Section in which 10the contents of claims are grouped into aggregates in such a 11way that information contained in any individual claim shall 12not be disclosed.13    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for taxable 14year 2017 and thereafter, in counties of 3,000,000 or more 15inhabitants, the amount of the exemption shall be the greater 16of (i) the amount of the exemption otherwise calculated under 17this Section or (ii) $2,000. 18    (c-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 19chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 20the 2020 taxable year, without application, for any property 21that was approved for this exemption for the 2019 taxable 22year, provided that: 23        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 24    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 25    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency; 26        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January   HB1756- 15 -LRB104 05744 HLH 15774 b1    1, 2020 is the same as the owner of record of the property 2    as of January 1, 2019; 3        (3) the exemption for the 2019 taxable year has not 4    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 5    this Code; and 6        (4) the applicant for the 2019 taxable year has not 7    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2019 or 2020 8    taxable years. 9    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude or impair the 10authority of a chief county assessment officer to conduct 11audits of any taxpayer claiming an exemption under this 12Section to verify that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the 13exemption as provided elsewhere in this Section. 14    (c-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 15chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 16the 2021 taxable year, without application, for any property 17that was approved for this exemption for the 2020 taxable 18year, if:19        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 20    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 21    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency;22        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 23    1, 2021 is the same as the owner of record of the property 24    as of January 1, 2020;25        (3) the exemption for the 2020 taxable year has not 26    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by   HB1756- 16 -LRB104 05744 HLH 15774 b1    this Code; and2        (4) the taxpayer for the 2020 taxable year has not 3    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2020 or 2021 4    taxable years.5    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude or impair the 6authority of a chief county assessment officer to conduct 7audits of any taxpayer claiming an exemption under this 8Section to verify that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the 9exemption as provided elsewhere in this Section. 10    (d) Each Chief County Assessment Officer shall annually 11publish a notice of availability of the exemption provided 12under this Section. The notice shall be published at least 60 13days but no more than 75 days prior to the date on which the 14application must be submitted to the Chief County Assessment 15Officer of the county in which the property is located. The 16notice shall appear in a newspaper of general circulation in 17the county.18    Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 8 of the State Mandates 19Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for the 20implementation of any mandate created by this Section. 21(Source: P.A. 101-635, eff. 6-5-20; 102-136, eff. 7-23-21; 22102-895, eff. 5-23-22.) 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.